Washington statutes.
RCW 18.155.070

Certificate—Requirements.

The department shall issue a certificate to any applicant who meets the following requirements:

(1) Successful completion of an educational program approved by the secretary or successful completion of alternate training which meets the criteria of the secretary;

(2) Successful completion of any experience requirement established by the secretary;

(3) Successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the secretary;

(4) Not having engaged in unprofessional conduct or being unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or mental impairment;

(5) Not convicted of a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or convicted in any other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and

(6) Other requirements as may be established by the secretary that impact the competence of the sex offender treatment provider.

[ 2006 c 134 s 1; 1990 c 3 s 807.]